Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-1206
Director, defined.

Director shall mean the Director of Disability and Aging of the Division of Disability and Aging.

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 972;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 808;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 36.
July 18, 2026